District of Columbia statutes.
19-602.23

Payment on POD designation.

A financial institution, on request, may pay sums on deposit in an account with a POD designation to:

(1)

One or more of the parties, whether or not another party has a disability, is incapacitated, or deceased when the payment is requested and whether or not a party survives another party;

(2)

The beneficiary or beneficiaries, if proof of death is presented to the financial institution showing that the beneficiary or beneficiaries survived all persons named as parties; or

(3)

The personal representative, if any, or, if there is none, the heirs or devisees of a deceased party, if proof of death is presented to the financial institution showing that the deceased party was the survivor of all other persons named on the account, either as a party or beneficiary.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 302(b), 48 DCR 2087
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 33(c), 53 DCR 6198
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 223 of the Uniform Nonprobate Transfers on Death Act (1991 Act).
D.C. Law 16-305, in par. (1), substituted “has a disability” for “is disabled”.